Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 2 Department of Transportation
§ 24-2-111.
Cooperation with cities in construction of streets connecting state highways and construction of storm sewers along streets designated as state highways.

The transportation commission may cooperate with incorporated cities and towns in the construction of public streets and highways, including bridges and culverts, but excepting bypass routes, if the streets or highways constitute direct connections between sections of established state highways. All cooperative work shall be performed under the immediate control and supervision of the director of the department of transportation in accordance with plans and specifications prepared under the supervision of the director or the chief engineer, but no contract shall be let nor work commenced until sixty (60) days after the plans for the work have been submitted and approved by the legislative body of the incorporated city or town. The failure of the legislative body of the incorporated city or town to take official action approving or disapproving the plans within sixty (60) days shall constitute approval for the purpose of this section. The entire cost of construction of the streets and highways and the maintenance, including streets and highways currently in existence, shall be paid by the transportation commission with the following exceptions:

The cost of construction of storm sewers along streets designated as state highways shall be paid by the transportation commission. If the city decides to connect other storm sewers with the one constructed by the commission, the commission shall only pay for the cost of a storm sewer needed to provide drainage for the street. If additional costs are incurred, the cities shall pay these additional costs. The city or town, if the population is over fifteen hundred (1,500) or more, shall pay all costs of, and be responsible for, the cleaning and maintenance of the storm sewers;

The city or town, if it has a population of fifteen hundred (1,500) or more, shall pay all costs of, and be responsible for, the cleaning, sweeping and washing of, and snow removal from the streets and highways. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the transportation commission may contribute financial assistance to any city or town with a population between fifteen hundred (1,500) and five thousand (5,000) that is performing its duties under this paragraph in a total amount not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) per capita annually to the city or town;

The entire cost to the state of the construction, maintenance and acquisition of the necessary right-of-way for any highway route, which constitutes a bypass of any incorporated city or town, and which is constructed for the purpose of satisfying the highway construction standards established by the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials and approved by the federal highway administration including access control, regardless whether any portion lies within the corporate limits of any city or town, shall be paid by the transportation commission.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 8, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 52-107; Laws 1933, ch. 29, § 1; 1945, ch. 59, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 48-108; Laws 1957, ch. 89, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-39; Laws 1961, ch. 77, § 1; 1975, ch. 110, § 1; 1977, ch. 61, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2000, ch. 21, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to construction and maintenance to be performed at expense of state, see §

24-1-118

.

As to streets in unincorporated towns or villages, see §

24-3-125

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1923, ch. 8, § 2, repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 24-2-112.
Contracts and agreements with United States government.

The legislature of the state of Wyoming assents to the provisions of the act of congress approved July 11, 1916, entitled “an act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in the construction of rural post roads, and for other purposes,” together with all acts and legislation, amendatory or supplementary, or which shall grant or authorize aid for the construction, improvement, maintenance or repair of public roads or highways. The transportation commission is authorized to enter into all contracts and agreements with the United States government relating to the construction and maintenance of roads under the provisions of the act or acts of congress to submit the scheme or program or construction or maintenance as may be required by the federal highway administration and to do all other things necessary fully to carry out the cooperation contemplated and provided for by the act or acts, for the construction or improvement of highways under the act, the good faith of the state is pledged to make available funds sufficient to equal the sums apportioned to the state by or under the United States government during each of the years for which federal funds are appropriated by section 3 of the act and to maintain the roads so constructed with the aid of funds appropriated and to make adequate provisions for carrying out maintenance. Cooperative agreements under the provisions of the act shall be entered into with the federal highway administration only by the commission, but may be for the construction or improvement of either a state highway or a county road. If the road to be improved under such cooperative agreement is a state highway, the state’s share of the expense shall be borne entirely by the state; if the highway to be improved or constructed under such cooperative agreement is not a state highway, the state’s share of the cost of the work shall be divided between the state and the county upon such basis as the commission shall determine, and before an agreement is entered into with the federal highway administration the county must furnish the right-of-way and shall have entered into an agreement with the commission whereby it shall agree to pay its share of the cost and to pay the cost of all subsequent maintenance, work which shall be performed by and under the supervision of the director of the department of transportation, and the county also shall pay into the state highway fund its share of the estimated cost of the construction.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 3031; R.S. 1931, § 52-108; C.S. 1945, § 48-109; W.S. 1957, § 24-40; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to cooperative agreements with federal agencies by counties to construct, maintain and use roads, see §

24-3-127

.

As to cooperation with United States in constructing highways for defense, see §

19-7-204

.

Act of congress. —

The act of congress approved July 11, 1916, referred to in the first two sentences, was temporary and is no longer carried in the United States Code.

Quoted

in

Woolley v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 387 P.2d 667,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1963).

Stated

in

Town of Clearmont v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 357 P.2d 470,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo 1960).

§ 24-2-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 139, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 143, § 1, related to procurement of property containing road-building material. For present provisions, see § 24-2-102(a)(i)(A).

§ 24-2-114.
State agency law enforcement communications system; department duties and responsibilities.

The department of transportation shall:

Maintain, install, operate and dispatch the state agency law enforcement communications system as defined by W.S. 9-2-1101(b);

Supervise personnel and budget funds necessary for the maintenance, installation, operation and dispatching of the state agency law enforcement communications system; and

Provide technical assistance and advice as requested by the law enforcement communications commission and by the state [law enforcement] radio communications consultant.

The budget for maintenance, operation and dispatching of the state agency law enforcement communications system shall be approved by the director of the department of transportation and by the legislature.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 68, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 241, § 3; Laws 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2012, ch. 30, § 3.

The 2012 amendment,

deleted “subject to the supervision of the director of telecommunications as provided by W.S.

9-2-1026

.1” at the end of (a)(i).

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

State radio communications consultant. —

The bracketed material has been inserted in subsection (a)(iii) to provide the complete proper name of the office being referred to.

§ 24-2-115.
Program for specific service signing by businesses or attractions; department duties and responsibilities; contracting of duties; fees.

As authorized under W.S. 31-5-406(b), the department of transportation shall establish a program for specific service signing by business entities as part of departmental approved motorist service panels erected within rights-of-way along interstate and primary highways. The program shall be designed for information of interest to the traveling public in accordance with 23 U.S.C. 131(f).

In establishing the program under this section, the department shall by rule and regulation:

Provide for application by business entities for the display of its name or logo upon the specific service signing;

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 99, § 2.

Establish a uniform initial fee and annual permit fee for applicants to cover the costs of constructing, erecting and maintaining specific service signing, including the costs of contracting for any of these services;

Establish minimum standards for specific service signing by business entities in accordance with the current edition of the manual on uniform traffic control devices;

Provide for oversight of the program and subject to W.S. 9-2-3204(b), may establish necessary procedures for contracting services for the construction, erection and maintenance of highway specific service signing pursuant to this section;

Provide a fee system that includes an initial application fee, fabrication and installation fee and an annual administration and maintenance fee. At a minimum, the fee structure shall be set so that the department is fully reimbursed for all costs associated with specific service signing.

All fees collected by the department under the program shall be deposited into the state highway fund.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 31, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1996, ch. 47, § 1; 2014 ch. 99, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “specific service” for “informational” in (a), (b)(i), (b)(iv), and (b)(v); in (a), deleted “roadside information panels” in the first sentence and “advertising and” in the second sentence”; in (b)(v), substituted “the current edition of the manual on uniform traffic control devices” for “23 U.S.C. 315”; in (b)(v), substituted “oversight” for “the administration” and made stylistic changes; added (b)(vi); and in (c), deleted the former first sentence.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3204(b)" for "9-2-1016(b)" in (b)(v).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 24-2-116.
Department of transportation state-funded communications facilities.

Upon application by a telecommunications company, the Wyoming department of transportation may lease excess capacity on any state-funded communication infrastructure operated by the department of transportation to the telecommunications company. All monies received from any lease executed pursuant to this section shall be deposited into and separately accounted for in the department’s internal service fund specified by W.S. 9-4-204(t)(ii)(B) and governed by W.S. 9-4-205(e). Monies received and deposited under this section are continuously appropriated to the department and shall only be used to maintain, reinforce and repair the WyoLink network and towers.

As used in this section:

“Broadband provider” means a telecommunications company as defined by W.S. 37-15-103(a)(xi), a communications company under W.S. 1-26-813(b) or a cable operator as defined by 47 U.S.C. § 522(5);

“Telecommunications company” shall include a broadband provider.

History.

2015 ch. 71, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2021 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "state-funded" in the section heading; and rewrote the section, which read, "Upon application by a telecommunications company, if the public service commission determines that it is necessary to provide telecommunications service to underserved areas of the state, the Wyoming department of transportation shall lease excess capacity on any communication infrastructure or facility owned by the department of transportation to the telecommunications company. For purposes of this section an area is underserved if private communication providers are unwilling or unable to provide the telecommunication service to a substantial number of households or persons in the geographic area. The rate of the lease shall be a reasonable market-based rate as determined by the public service commission. No telecommunications company may lease excess capacity on a communication infrastructure or facility owned by the department pursuant to this section unless the telecommunications company establishes that excess capacity in that area is unavailable from private commercial communication facility owners. The public service commission may adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this section. All monies received from any lease executed pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the state general fund."